District of Columbia statutes.
38-824.04

Access to public facilities.

The Department of Parks and Recreation shall provide equal access and shall charge equal fees to both public schools and public charter schools for the use of its recreation centers, fields, playgrounds, and other facilities.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 404, 57 DCR 4779

History